Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2011
85-2420
Enforcement of act; Attorney General
or county attorney; powers.

The Attorney General or the county attorney of the county
in which a postsecondary institution is located, at the request of the commission
or on his or her own accord, may bring any appropriate action or proceeding
in any court of competent jurisdiction to enforce the Postsecondary Institution
Act.

Laws 2011, LB637, § 20.
May 5, 2011